Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1797
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that it is imperative that the State of Nebraska protect its investment and the progress made in its efforts to alleviate the nursing shortage which exists. The Legislature also finds that the Nebraska Center for Nursing will provide the appropriate means to do so. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds necessary for the center to carry out the Nebraska Center for Nursing Act, including, but not limited to, (1) administrative costs incurred by the Department of Health and Human Services to expand clinical training sites as provided in subsection (3) of section 71-1798 and (2) funds for such expansion of clinical training sites in the amount of three million dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2023-24 and three million dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2024-25.

Laws 2000, LB 1025, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 75.